Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 9. Multiple Use of State Land.

Sec. 38.05.285.
Multiple use.

Disposal and use of state land shall conform to the constitution of the State of Alaska and the principles of multiple purpose use consistent with the public interest.

History.

(§ 1 art X ch 169 SLA 1959)

Administrative Code. —

For grazing leases, see 11 AAC 60.